District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

6-258.01

District of Columbia Housing Authority Police Force.

Repealed.

March 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-243, § 10a
as added Mar. 20, 1998, D.C. Law 12-62, § 2(b), 44 DCR 7486
May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-105, § 30, 47 DCR 1325

History

1981 Ed., § 5-128.1.

Prior Codifications

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of Housing Authority Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-272, April 27, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4278).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of Housing Authority Temporary Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Law 13-92, April 12, 2000, law notification 47 DCR 2843).

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2(b) of District of Columbia Housing Authority Police Temporary Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Law 11-208, April 9, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 2403).

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary addition of section, see § 2(b) of the District of Columbia Housing Authority Police Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-357, August 8, 1996, 43 DCR 4628), § 2(b) of the District of Columbia Housing Authority Police Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-417, October 28, 1996, 43 DCR 6080), § 2(b) of the District of Columbia Housing Authority Police Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-470, December 30, 1996, 44 DCR 184), § 2(b) of the District of Columbia Housing Authority Police Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-67, Apr. 18, 1997, 44 DCR 2617), and § 2(b) of the Housing Authority Police Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-217, November 21, 1997, 44 DCR 7622).
For temporary addition of section, see § 2(b) of the Housing Authority Police Congressional Recess Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-289, February 27, 1998, 45 DCR 1743).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(b) of the Housing Authority Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-569, January 12, 1999, 45 DCR 887).
For temporary (90-day) repeal of sections, see § 29 of the District of Columbia Housing Authority Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-259, February 9, 2000, 47 DCR 1129).
For temporary (90-day) repeal of sections, see § 29 of the District of Columbia Housing Authority Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-346, June 5, 2000, 47 DCR 4980).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of the Housing Authority Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-200, December 1, 1999, 46 DCR 10448).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of the Housing Authority Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-274, March 7, 2000, 47 DCR 2008).

Emergency Legislation